Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5427
Description of review procedures; toll-free number.

(1) In the certificate of coverage or member handbook provided to covered persons, a health carrier shall include a clear and comprehensive description of its utilization review procedures, including the procedures for obtaining review of adverse determinations, and a statement of rights and responsibilities of covered persons with respect to those procedures.

(2) A health carrier shall include a summary of its utilization review procedures in enrollment materials intended for prospective covered persons.

(3) A health carrier shall print on its membership cards a toll-free telephone number to call for utilization review decisions.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 12.